Utah statutes.
63M-6-201.   Acquisition of easements -- Restrictions -- Resale.
(1) (a)  The Governor's Office of Economic Development shall acquire, by
purchase or condemnation, easements for the establishment, maintenance, and
operation of a restrictive use area for the operation of aircraft to and from
Hill Air Force Base because:
(i)  Hill Air Force Base is a military installation of vital importance to
security of the United States of America and to the economic well-being of the
citizens of Utah;
(ii)  there are certain portions of land around the entire base that are being
developed for residential and other uses that are incompatible with current
and future operations of the base because of noise, health, safety, and
accident reasons; and
(iii)  it is the purpose of this chapter for the state to acquire those
easements restricting the use of those lands and the air space above them in
order to assure the continued operation of Hill Air Force Base as an active
military base and to protect the health, safety, and economic well-being of
the citizens of Utah.
(b)  The Governor's Office of Economic Development may delegate its power to
purchase or condemn easements under this subsection to other state agencies if
the department ensures that those agencies comply with the procedures and
requirements of this chapter.
(2) (a)  The Governor's Office of Economic Development shall ensure that the
easements restrict the land from those uses identified in the Hill Air Force
Base AICUZ Land Use Compatibility Guidelines Study, as amended, dated October,
1982, as not being acceptable.
(b)  The Governor's Office of Economic Development may allow certain other
uses not prohibited by those guidelines if those uses are consistent with the
purpose of this chapter.
(c)  Nothing in this chapter may be construed to authorize the Governor's
Office of Economic Development or any other state agency to:
(i)  acquire any ownership interest in real property other than an easement
restricting the land from future uses inconsistent with the Hill Air Force
Base AICUZ Land Use Compatibility Guidelines Study, as amended, dated October
1982;
(ii)  purchase businesses; or
(iii)  require people to relocate or move from their property.
(d)  To calculate the purchase price for the easements, the Governor's Office
of Economic Development shall subtract the market value of the real property
and its improvements after the acquisition of the easements from the market
value of the real property and its improvements before the acquisition of the
easements.
(e)  When the Hill Air Force Base runways have not been used for seven years
to accommodate the arrival and departure of airplanes, the Governor's Office
of Economic Development shall:
(i)  notify by certified mail each current owner of the property to which each
easement is attached;
(ii)  inform that owner that the owner may purchase the easement from the
state for the same price that the state paid for it originally or for the
market value of the easement at the time of the buyback, whichever is smaller;
and
(iii)  sell the easement to the owner of the property to which the easement is
attached if the owner tenders the purchase price.
(f)  In addition to purchasing the easements required by this chapter, the
Governor's Office of Economic Development may provide reasonable relocation
expenses to all churches, businesses, and schools that, as of March 1, 1994,
were located either within the north Hill Air Force Base accident potential
zone (APZ) identified in Subsection 63M-6-202(1)(a) or within the south Hill
Air Force Base accident potential zone (APZ) identified in Subsection
63M-6-202(1)(b) if those churches, businesses, and schools can reasonably
demonstrate that expansion of the use would have been permitted before
acquisition of the easements but is now prohibited because of the easement.
(3) (a)  The Governor's Office of Economic Development may take action to
enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(b)  The attorney general shall represent the Governor's Office of Economic
Development in that action.
